Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1343
Assessment process; recommendations; department; duties.

The Department of Transportation shall establish the grade crossing safety assessment process no later than twelve months after September 13, 1997, and shall recommend to the Legislature no later than eighteen months after September 13, 1997, an equitable formula for funding grade crossing risk abatement.

Laws 1997, LB 255, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 265.